apertium-mos.mos.dix
	<pardef n="pãnm/e__vblex">
		<e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>dẽ</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
		<e w="1"> <p><l>-y</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>ame</l>       <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>ame</l>       <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
<pardef n="pãnm/e__vblex">
		<e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>dẽ</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
		<e w="1"> <p><l>-y</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>ame</l>       <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>ame</l>       <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
<pardef n="paoog/e__vblex">
		<e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>dẽ</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
		<e w="1"> <p><l>-y</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>ame</l>       <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>ame</l>       <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	<pardef n="pãr/e__vblex">
		<e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>dẽ</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
		<e w="1"> <p><l>-y</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>ame</l>       <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>ame</l>       <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	<pardef n="pasg/e__vblex">
		<e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>dẽ</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
		<e w="1"> <p><l>-y</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>ame</l>       <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>ame</l>       <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	<pardef n="pãsg/e__vblex">
		<e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>dẽ</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
		<e w="1"> <p><l>-y</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>ame</l>       <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>ame</l>       <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	<pardef n="peeb/e__vblex">
		<e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>dẽ</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
		<e w="1"> <p><l>-y</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>ame</l>       <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>ame</l>       <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	<pardef n="pees/e__vblex">
		<e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>dẽ</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
		<e w="1"> <p><l>-y</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>ame</l>       <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>ame</l>       <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	<pardef n="pẽes/e__vblex">
		<e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>dẽ</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
		<e w="1"> <p><l>-y</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>ame</l>       <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>ame</l>       <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	<pardef n="pẽg/e__vblex">
		<e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>dẽ</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
		<e w="1"> <p><l>-y</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>ame</l>       <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>ame</l>       <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	<pardef n="peng/e__vblex">
		<e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>dẽ</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
		<e w="1"> <p><l>-y</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>ame</l>       <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>ame</l>       <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	<pardef n="pẽneg/e__vblex">
		<e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>dẽ</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
		<e w="1"> <p><l>-y</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>ame</l>       <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>ame</l>       <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	<pardef n="piil/i_vblex">
		<e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>dẽ</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
		<e w="1"> <p><l>i-y</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>ame</l>       <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>ame</l>       <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	<pardef n="pilg/i_vblex">
		<e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>dẽ</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
		<e w="1"> <p><l>i-y</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>ame</l>       <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>ame</l>       <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>

	<e lm="pãnme">            <i>pãnm</i><par n="pãnm/e__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="paooge">           <i>paoog</i><par n="paoog/e__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="pãre">             <i>pãr</i><par n="pãr/e__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="pasge">            <i>pasg</i><par n="pasg/e__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="pãsge">            <i>pãsg</i><par n="pãsg/e__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="peebe">            <i>peeb</i><par n="peeb/e__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="peese">            <i>pees</i><par n="pees/e__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="pẽese">            <i>pẽes</i><par n="pẽes/e__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="pẽge">             <i>pẽg</i><par n="pẽg/e__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="penge">            <i>peng</i><par n="peng/e__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="pẽnege">           <i>pẽneg</i><par n="pẽneg/e__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="piili">            <i>piil</i><par n="piil/i_vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="pilgi">            <i>pilg</i><par n="pilg/i_vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="pãnme">            <i>pãnm</i><par n="pãnm/e__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="paooge">           <i>paoog</i><par n="paoog/e__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="pãre">             <i>pãr</i><par n="pãr/e__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="pasge">            <i>pasg</i><par n="pasg/e__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="pãsge">            <i>pãsg</i><par n="pãsg/e__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="peebe">            <i>peeb</i><par n="peeb/e__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="peese">            <i>pees</i><par n="pees/e__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="pẽese">            <i>pẽes</i><par n="pẽes/e__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="pẽge">             <i>pẽg</i><par n="pẽg/e__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="penge">            <i>peng</i><par n="peng/e__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="pẽnege">           <i>pẽneg</i><par n="pẽneg/e__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="piili">            <i>piil</i><par n="piil/i_vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="pilgi">            <i>pilg</i><par n="pilg/i_vblex"/></e>
